packages/schema/dict/ceeline.aff
# Ceeline Compact Dialect — Affix Rules
# Format: Hunspell-compatible .aff
# Purpose: morphological grammar for the Ceeline compact language
#
# This file defines prefix and suffix rules that modify root stems
# (defined in ceeline.dic) to produce derived compact codes.
#
# The Ceeline runtime reads this at registry-init time and uses
# the affix rules to resolve morphological compounds without
# requiring every combination to be registered individually.
#
# DESIGN PRINCIPLE: A small set of roots + affix rules = infinite vocabulary.
# Agents can coin new stems via session vocab; the affixes still apply.

SET UTF-8
LANG cel

# =========================================================================
#  PREFIX CLASSES
# =========================================================================
#
# Prefixes modify the semantics of any root code.
# Syntax: PFX <flag> <cross> <count>
#         PFX <flag> <strip> <add> <condition>
#
# Flags are single uppercase letters.

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# N — Negation / absence
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: neg.<root>  →  "not <meaning>"
# Example:  neg.ok  →  "not success"  |  neg.dr  →  "not direct routing"
PFX N Y 1
PFX N 0 neg. .

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# R — Re- / again / retry
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: re.<root>  →  "repeat/retry <meaning>"
# Example:  re.ho  →  "re-handoff"  |  re.rv  →  "re-review"
PFX R Y 1
PFX R 0 re. .

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# P — Prior / previous   
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: prev.<root>  →  "previous <meaning>"
# Example:  prev.ss  →  "previous session"  |  prev.dg  →  "prior digest"
PFX P Y 1
PFX P 0 prev. .

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# T — Tentative / proposed
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: tent.<root>  →  "tentative/proposed <meaning>"
# Example:  tent.dr  →  "tentative direct routing"  |  tent.mu  →  "proposed mutating"
PFX T Y 1
PFX T 0 tent. .

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# D — Delegated / inherited
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: del.<root>  →  "delegated/inherited from parent"
# Example:  del.ho  →  "delegated handoff"  |  del.ro  →  "inherited read_only"
PFX D Y 1
PFX D 0 del. .

# =========================================================================
#  SYMBOL FLAG CLASS
# =========================================================================
#
# U — Unicode symbol stem
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Marks a stem as a Tier 1 single-token Unicode symbol (Greek, arrow, shape,
# block, math, or dingbat).  Symbol stems participate in compound expressions
# (Layer 2) and surface-dependent polysemy (Layer 3).
#
# Symbol stems do NOT take morphological prefixes/suffixes (no neg.● or ●.seq).
# The U flag is used only for registry membership and dict-sync validation.

# =========================================================================
#  SUFFIX CLASSES
# =========================================================================
#
# Suffixes modify the structural role of a root code.
# Syntax: SFX <flag> <cross> <count>
#         SFX <flag> <strip> <add> <condition>

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Q — Sequence / plural / list-of
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: <root>.seq  →  "sequence of <meaning>"
# Example:  ho.seq  →  "handoff sequence"  |  fa.seq  →  "fact sequence"
SFX Q Y 1
SFX Q 0 .seq .

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# O — Optional / nullable
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: <root>.opt  →  "optional <meaning>"
# Example:  cit.opt  →  "optional citations"  |  tgt.opt  →  "optional target"
SFX O Y 1
SFX O 0 .opt .

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# X — Reference / pointer-to
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: <root>.ref  →  "reference to <meaning>"
# Example:  ho.ref  →  "reference to handoff envelope"  |  me.ref  →  "memory reference"
SFX X Y 1
SFX X 0 .ref .

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# A — Alias / shorthand binding
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: <root>.as  →  "aliased as / shorthand for"
# Example:  review.security.as  →  binds the alias to an intent pattern
# Used in session vocab definitions.
SFX A Y 1
SFX A 0 .as .

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# M — Multi / compound
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: <root>.multi  →  "multiple/compound <meaning>"
# Example:  rt.multi  →  "multi-routing (fan-out)"  |  src.multi  →  "multiple source refs"
SFX M Y 1
SFX M 0 .multi .

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# V — Version / snapshot
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Produces: <root>.v<n>  — handled by the runtime, not affix rule
# This flag marks stems that can accept version suffixes.
# Example:  ho.v2  →  "handoff schema version 2"
# Runtime resolves .v\d+ on any stem with flag V.
SFX V Y 1
SFX V 0 .v .

# =========================================================================
#  CROSS-PRODUCT
# =========================================================================
#
# Prefixes and suffixes can combine (cross-product = Y on both).
# Example:  re.ho.seq  →  "retry handoff sequence"
#           neg.ok.ref  →  "reference to a non-success"
#           prev.dg.v   →  "prior digest version"
#
# The runtime resolves left-to-right: prefix → stem → suffix.
# At most one prefix and one suffix per token.

# =========================================================================
#  COMPOUND RULES
# =========================================================================
#
# Ceeline allows compound stems joined by `.` (dot).
# This is used for scoped codes like surface.field compounds:
#   ho.role  →  handoff's role field
#   rt.str   →  routing's strategy field
#
# Compounds are resolved by the registry, not affix rules.
# The .aff file documents them here for completeness.
COMPOUNDFLAG C
COMPOUNDMIN 1

# =========================================================================
#  SESSION VOCAB
# =========================================================================
#
# Agents can define session-scoped stems using the `vocab=` clause:
#   vocab=myterm:definition
#
# Session stems inherit all affix rules. They are ephemeral.
# See ceeline-language-spec-v1.md §Session Vocabulary.
