packages/schema/dict/ceeline.dic
@cl2/V
ho/NRPDQXMVC
dg/NRPQXVC
me/NRPDQXVC
rf/NRPQXVC
ts/NRPQXVC
rt/NRPDQXMVC
pc/NRPDQXVC
hs/NRPQXVC
i/NTC
cu/NTC
ro/NTDC
ad/NTDC
mu/NTDC
rj/NC
vb/NC
pt/NC
fp/QC
ti/QC
ag/QC
mo/QC
cmd/QC
env/QC
ver/QC
key/QC
ph/QC
sec/QC
url/QC
cs/QC
cf/QC
sum/ROQC
f/QC
ask/ROQC
art/QOXC
tok/QC
cls/QC
role/OC
tgt/OXC
sc/NRQOC
pl/NRC
rv/NRC
co/NRC
pa/NRC
im/NRC
fx/NRC
sa/NRC
win/PC
met/QC
ok/NC
wr/NC
er/NC
tr/PQC
ss/PQC
rn/PQC
cit/QC
fa/NRC
de/NRC
rs/NRC
cnf/OC
rev/ROQC
hy/NRC
pr/NRC
cc/NRC
tn/OXC
ela/OC
fl/NRC
sk/NRC
cand/QXC
sel/OXC
dr/NTC
bc/NTC
cn/NTC
fb/NTC
pri/OC
src/OXC
sy/NC
ij/NC
gr/NC
tc/OC
anc/OXC
ex/PQC
labels/QC
pid/XC
vul/NRQC
ath/NRC
azn/NRC
byp/NRC
ij2/NRQC
xss/QC
crf/QC
prv/NRQC
esc/NRC
acl/NRC
tkv/NRC
snt/NRC
enc/NRC
tls/NC
crt/NQXC
sqi/QC
bof/QC
dos/NC
rlm/NRC
owp/XC
pen/QC
exf/NRC
hsh/NRC
rbac/NC
lat/NRQOC
thr/NRQC
cch/NRQC
gcl/NQC
mmu/NRQC
cpu/NQC
prf/RC
btl/NRQC
p50/OC
p95/OC
p99/OC
cld/NRC
wrm/RC
pol/NRQC
bat/NRC
ccr/NQC
idx/NRQC
qop/RQC
iop/NQC
alc/NRQC
ttl/NOC
rps/QC
sat2/NQC
lay/NQC
bnd/NRQC
cpl/NRQC
coh/NRC
mdl/NRQXC
svc/NRQXC
gwy/NQXC
fcd/NXC
adp/NQXC
pxy/NXC
obs2/QXC
evt/NRQC
msg2/NRQC
que/NRQC
pip/NRQC
mdw/NQXC
sch2/NRQVC
mig/NRQC
dep2/NRQXC
api/NRQXVC
ctr2/NRQC
ddd/NQXC
agg/NQXC
cov/NRQC
ast2/NRQC
mck/NRQC
stb/NRQC
fxt/NRQXC
reg2/NRQC
flk/NRQC
ste/NRQXC
scn/NRQC
exp2/NRC
act2/NRC
e2e/NQC
unt/NRQC
itg/NRQC
snp2/NRQC
pas/NQC
skp/NQC
tmo/NRQC
rty2/NRQC
hns/NQXC
bln/NRQVC
